Utah statutes.
17-36-12.   Notice of budget hearing.
(1)  The governing body shall determine the time and place for the public
hearing on the adoption of the budget.
(2)  Notice of such hearing shall be published:
(a) (i)  at least seven days before the hearing in at least one newspaper of
general circulation within the county, if there is such a paper; or
(ii)  if there is no newspaper as described in Subsection (2)(a)(i), by
posting notice in three conspicuous places within the county seven days before
the hearing; and
(b) on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701, for seven
days before the hearing.
